Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 3. System Restructuring.

§ 37.2-316.
System restructuring; state and community consensus and planning team required.

For the purpose of considering any restructuring of the system of mental health services involving an existing state hospital, the Commissioner shall establish a state and community consensus and planning team consisting of Department staff and representatives of the localities served by the state hospital, including local government officials, individuals receiving services, family members of individuals receiving services, advocates, state hospital employees, community services boards, behavioral health authorities, public and private service providers, licensed hospitals, local health department staff, local social services department staff, sheriffs’ office staff, area agencies on aging, and other interested persons. In addition, the members of the House of Delegates and the Senate representing the localities served by the affected state hospital may serve on the state and community consensus and planning team for that state hospital. Each state and community consensus and planning team, in collaboration with the Commissioner, shall develop a plan that addresses (i) the types, amounts, and locations of new and expanded community services that would be needed to successfully implement the closure or conversion of the state hospital to any use other than the provision of mental health services, including a six-year projection of the need for inpatient psychiatric beds and related community mental health services; (ii) the development of a detailed implementation plan designed to build community mental health infrastructure for current and future capacity needs; (iii) the creation of new and enhanced community services prior to the closure of the state hospital or its conversion to any use other than the provision of mental health services; (iv) the transition of individuals receiving services in the state hospital to community services in the locality of their residence prior to admission or the locality of their choice after discharge; (v) the resolution of issues relating to the restructuring implementation process, including employment issues involving state hospital employee transition planning and appropriate transitional benefits; and (vi) a six-year projection comparing the cost of the current structure and the proposed structure.

The Commissioner shall ensure that each plan includes the following components:

A plan for community education;

A plan for the implementation of required community services, including state-of-the-art practice models and any models required to meet the unique characteristics of the area to be served, which may include models for rural areas;

A plan for assuring the availability of adequate staff in the affected communities, including specific strategies for transferring qualified state hospital employees to community services;

A plan for assuring the development, funding, and implementation of individualized discharge plans pursuant to §

37.2-505

for individuals discharged as a result of the closure or conversion of the state hospital to any use other than the provision of mental health services; and

A provision for suspending implementation of the plan if the total general funds appropriated to the Department for state hospital and community services decrease in any year of plan implementation by more than 10 percent from the year in which the plan was approved by the General Assembly.

At least nine months prior to any proposed state hospital closure or conversion of the state hospital to any use other than the provision of mental health services, the state and community consensus and planning team shall submit a plan to the Joint Commission on Health Care and the Governor for review and recommendation.

The Joint Commission on Health Care shall make a recommendation to the General Assembly on the plan no later than six months prior to the date of the proposed closure or conversion of the state hospital to any use other than the provision of mental health services.

Upon approval of the plan by the General Assembly and the Governor, the Commissioner shall ensure that the plan components required by subsection B are in place and may thereafter perform all tasks necessary to implement the closure or conversion of the state hospital to any use other than the provision of mental health services.

Any funds saved by the closure or conversion of the state hospital to any use other than the provision of mental health services and not allocated to individualized services plans for individuals being transferred or discharged as a result of the closure or conversion of the state hospital to any use other than the provision of mental health services shall be invested in the Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund established in Article 4 (§

37.2-317

et seq.).

Nothing in this section shall prevent the Commissioner from leasing unused, vacant space to any public or private organization.

History.

2002, c. 803, § 37.1-48.2; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 803,
cl. 2, provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall facilitate coordination among the Virginia Department of Housing and Community Development, the Virginia Housing Development Authority, and the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development in order to ensure that adequate housing options are available for individuals transitioning to community services.”

Acts 2002, c. 803, cl. 3, provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall coordinate the efforts of the Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in seeking the maximum Medicaid service options and potential Medicaid waivers from the federal Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.”

Acts 2002, c. 803, cl. 4, provides: “That the Secretaries of Commerce and Trade, Administration, Education, Transportation, and Public Safety shall assist the Secretary of Health and Human Resources in developing strategies to provide transition services and appropriate transitional benefits to any affected state facility employees, and to assist any affected local communities with economic development opportunities and transportation needs.”

Acts 2002, c. 803, cl. 5, provides: “That, for purposes of this act, whenever any reference is made to the Joint Commission on Health Care, such reference shall be deemed to include any successor in interest of the Joint Commission on Health Care.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardaton and Substance Abuse Services Trust Fund” at the end of subsection F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “individuals receiving services, family members of individuals receiving services” for “consumers, family members of consumers” in the first sentence, and “the transition of individuals receiving services in the state hospital” for “the transition of state hospital consumers” in clause (iv) of the third sentence; and in subsection F, substituted “individuals” for “consumers” and deleted “of this chapter” at the end.